Utah statutes.
63G-6-902 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Services between public procurement units.

(1)  Upon request, any public procurement unit may make available to other public procurement units the following services, among others: standard forms; printed manuals; qualified products lists; source information; common use commodities listings; supplier prequalification information; supplier performance ratings; debarred and suspended bidders lists; forms for invitation for bids, requests for proposals, instructions to bidders, general contract provisions, and other contract forms; and contracts or published summaries thereof, including price and time of delivery information.

(2)  Any public procurement unit may provide the following technical services, among others, to other public procurement units; development of specifications; development of quality assurance test methods, including receiving, inspection, and acceptance procedures; use of testing and inspection facilities; and use of personnel training programs.

(3)  Public procurement units may enter into contractual arrangements and publish a schedule of fees for the services provided under Subsections (1) and (2).

